Alaska statutes. Title 45. Trade and Commerce.
Article 8. Transitional Provisions for 2013 Amendments.

Sec. 45.29.802.
Applicability.

Except as otherwise provided in AS

45.29.803

—

45.29.807

, AS

45.29.102(a)(8)

, (13), (61), (85), and (88),

45.29.105

,

45.29.307(f)

,

45.29.311(a)

,

45.29.316(h)

and (i),

45.29.317(b)

and (d),

45.29.326

,

45.29.406(e)

,

45.29.408(b)

,

45.29.503(a)

, (b), and (f) — (h),

45.29.507(c)

,

45.29.515(f)

,

45.29.516(b)

,

45.29.518

, and

45.29.607(b)

, as those provisions read on July 1, 2013, apply to a transaction or lien within the scope of AS

45.29.102(a)(8)

, (13), (61), (85), and (88),

45.29.105

,

45.29.307(f)

,

45.29.311(a)

,

45.29.316(h)

and (i),

45.29.317(b)

and (d),

45.29.326

,

45.29.406(e)

,

45.29.408(b)

,

45.29.503(a)

, (b), and (f) — (h),

45.29.507(c)

,

45.29.515(f)

,

45.29.516(b)

,

45.29.518

, and

45.29.607(b)

, as those provisions read on July 1, 2013, even if the transaction or lien was entered into or created before July 1, 2013.

History.

(§ 26 ch 64 SLA 2013)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as sec. 26, ch. 64, SLA 2013, and codified in 2013. Section 26, ch. 64, SLA 2013 reads: “Except as otherwise provided in secs. 27 — 31 of this Act, secs. 3 — 25 of this Act apply to a transaction or lien within the scope of secs. 3 — 25 of this Act, even if the transaction or lien was entered into or created before July 1, 2013.”

Cross references. —

See also AS

45.29.702(a)

.

Sec. 45.29.803.
Security interest perfected before July 1, 2013.

A security interest that is a perfected security interest immediately before July 1, 2013, is a perfected security interest under AS

45.29.101

—

45.29.709

, as those sections read on July 1, 2013, if, immediately before July 1, 2013, the applicable requirements for attachment and perfection under AS

45.29.101

—

45.29.709

, as those sections read on July 1, 2013, are satisfied without further action.

Except as otherwise provided in AS

45.29.805

, if, immediately before July 1, 2013, a security interest is a perfected security interest, but the applicable requirements for perfection under AS

45.29.101

—

45.29.709

, as those sections read on July 1, 2013, are not satisfied on or before June 30, 2013, the security interest remains perfected on and after July 1, 2013, only if the applicable requirements for perfection under AS

45.29.101

—

45.29.709

, as those sections read on July 1, 2013, are satisfied not later than July 1, 2014.

History.

(§ 27 ch 64 SLA 2013)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as sec. 27, ch. 64, SLA 2013, and codified in 2013. Section 27, ch. 64, SLA 2013 reads: “Transition: Security interest perfected before effective date. (a) A security interest that is a perfected security interest immediately before July 1, 2013, is a perfected security interest under AS 45.29, as amended by secs. 3 — 25 of this Act, if, immediately before July 1, 2013, the applicable requirements for attachment and perfection under AS 45.29, as amended by secs. 3 — 25 of this Act, are satisfied without further action.

“(b) Except as otherwise provided in sec. 29 of this Act, if, immediately before July 1, 2013, a security interest is a perfected security interest, but the applicable requirements for perfection under AS 45.29, as amended by secs. 3 — 25 of this Act, are not satisfied on or before June 30, 2013, the security interest remains perfected on and after July 1, 2013, only if the applicable requirements for perfection under AS 45.29, as amended by secs. 3 — 25 of this Act, are satisfied not later than July 1, 2014.”

Cross references. —

See also AS

45.29.703

.

Sec. 45.29.804.
Security interest unperfected before July 1, 2013.

A security interest that is an unperfected security interest on June 30, 2013, becomes a perfected security interest

without further action on July 1, 2013, if the applicable requirements for perfection under AS

45.29.101

—

45.29.709

, as those sections read on July 1, 2013, are satisfied on or before June 30, 2013; or

when the applicable requirements for perfection are satisfied if the requirements are satisfied on or after July 1, 2013.

History.

(§ 28 ch 64 SLA 2013)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as sec. 28, ch. 64, SLA 2013, and codified in 2013. Section 28, ch. 64, SLA 2013 reads: “Transition: Security interest unperfected before effective date. A security interest that is an unperfected security interest on June 30, 2013, becomes a perfected security interest

“(1) without further action on July 1, 2013, if the applicable requirements for perfection under AS 45.29, as amended by secs. 3 — 25 of this Act, are satisfied on or before June 30, 2013; or

“(2) when the applicable requirements for perfection are satisfied if the requirements are satisfied on or after July 1, 2013.”

Cross references. —

See also AS

45.29.704

.

Sec. 45.29.805.
Effectiveness of action taken before July 1, 2013.

The filing of a financing statement before July 1, 2013, is effective to perfect a security interest to the extent the filing would satisfy the applicable requirements for perfection under AS

45.29.101

—

45.29.709

, as those sections read on July 1, 2013.

AS

45.29.102(a)(8)

, (13), (61), (85), and (88), AS

45.29.105

,

45.29.307(f)

,

45.29.311(a)

,

45.29.316(h)

and (i),

45.29.317(b)

and (d),

45.29.326

,

45.29.406(e)

,

45.29.408(b)

,

45.29.503(a)

, (b), and (f) — (h),

45.29.507(c)

,

45.29.515(f)

,

45.29.516(b)

,

45.29.518

, and

45.29.607(b)

, as those provisions read on July 1, 2013, do not render ineffective an effective financing statement that, before July 1, 2013, is filed and satisfies the applicable requirements for perfection under the law of the jurisdiction governing perfection as provided in this chapter, as this chapter read on June 30, 2013. However, except as otherwise provided in (c) and (d) of this section and AS

45.29.806

, the financing statement ceases to be effective,

if the financing statement is filed in this state, at the time the financing statement would have ceased to be effective had AS

45.29.102(a)(8)

, (13), (61), and (88), AS

45.29.105

,

45.29.307(f)

,

45.29.311(a)

,

45.29.317(b)

and (d),

45.29.326

,

45.29.406(e)

,

45.29.408(b)

,

45.29.503(a)

and (b),

45.29.507(c)

,

45.29.515(f)

,

45.29.516(b)

,

45.29.518

, and

45.29.607(b)

, continued to read as those provisions read on June 30, 2013; or

if the financing statement is filed in another jurisdiction, at the earlier of

the time the financing statement would have ceased to be effective under the law of that jurisdiction; or

June 30, 2018.

The filing of a continuation statement on or after July 1, 2013, does not continue the effectiveness of a financing statement filed before July 1, 2013. However, upon the timely filing of a continuation statement on or after July 1, 2013, and in accordance with the law of the jurisdiction governing perfection as provided in AS

45.29.101

—

45.29.709

, as those sections read on July 1, 2013, the effectiveness of a financing statement filed in the same office in that jurisdiction before July 1, 2013, continues for the period provided by the law of that jurisdiction.

The provisions of (b)(2)(B) of this section apply to a financing statement that, before July 1, 2013, is filed against a transmitting utility and satisfies the applicable requirements for perfection under the law of the jurisdiction governing perfection as provided in this chapter, as this chapter read on June 30, 2013, only to the extent that AS

45.29.101

—

45.29.709

, as those sections read on July 1, 2013, provide that the law of a jurisdiction other than the jurisdiction in which the financing statement is filed governs perfection of a security interest in collateral covered by the financing statement.

A financing statement that includes a financing statement filed before July 1, 2013, and a continuation statement filed on or after July 1, 2013, is effective only to the extent that it satisfies the requirements of AS

45.29.503(a)

, (b), and (f) — (h),

45.29.507(c)

,

45.29.515(f)

,

45.29.516(b)

, and

45.29.518

, as those provisions read on July 1, 2013, for an initial financing statement. If a financing statement indicates that the debtor is a decedent’s estate, the financing statement indicates that the collateral is being administered by a personal representative within the meaning of AS

45.29.503(a)(2)

, as that paragraph read on July 1, 2013. If a financing statement indicates that the debtor is a trust or is a trustee acting with respect to property held in trust, the financing statement indicates that the collateral is held in a trust within the meaning of AS

45.29.503(a)(3)

, as that paragraph read on July 1, 2013.

History.

(§ 29 ch 64 SLA 2013)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as sec. 29, ch. 64, SLA 2013, and codified in 2013. Section 29, ch. 64, SLA 2013 reads: “Transition: Effectiveness of action taken before effective date. (a) The filing of a financing statement before July 1, 2013, is effective to perfect a security interest to the extent the filing would satisfy the applicable requirements for perfection under AS 45.29, as amended by secs. 3 — 25 of this Act.

“(b) Sections 3 — 25 of this Act do not render ineffective an effective financing statement that, before July 1, 2013, is filed and satisfies the applicable requirements for perfection under the law of the jurisdiction governing perfection as provided in AS 45.29, as it existed before being amended by secs. 3 — 25 of this Act. However, except as otherwise provided in (c) and (d) of this section and sec. 30 of this Act, the financing statement ceases to be effective,

“(1) if the financing statement is filed in this state, at the time the financing statement would have ceased to be effective had secs. 3 — 25 of this Act not taken effect; or

“(2) if the financing statement is filed in another jurisdiction, at the earlier of

“(A) the time the financing statement would have ceased to be effective under the law of that jurisdiction; or

“(B) June 30, 2018.

“(c) The filing of a continuation statement on or after July 1, 2013, does not continue the effectiveness of a financing statement filed before July 1, 2013. However, upon the timely filing of a continuation statement on or after July 1, 2013, and in accordance with the law of the jurisdiction governing perfection as provided in AS 45.29, as amended by secs. 3 — 25 of this Act, the effectiveness of a financing statement filed in the same office in that jurisdiction before July 1, 2013, continues for the period provided by the law of that jurisdiction.

“(d) The provisions of (b)(2)(B) of this section apply to a financing statement that, before July 1, 2013, is filed against a transmitting utility and satisfies the applicable requirements for perfection under the law of the jurisdiction governing perfection as provided in AS 45.29, as it existed before being amended by secs. 3 — 25 of this Act, only to the extent that AS 45.29, as amended by secs. 3 — 25 of this Act, provides that the law of a jurisdiction other than the jurisdiction in which the financing statement is filed governs perfection of a security interest in collateral covered by the financing statement.

“(e) A financing statement that includes a financing statement filed before July 1, 2013, and a continuation statement filed on or after July 1, 2013, is effective only to the extent that it satisfies the requirements of AS

45.29.503(a)

, as repealed and reenacted by sec. 17 of this Act, AS

45.29.503(b)

, as amended by sec. 18 of this Act, AS

45.29.503(f)

— (h), added by sec. 19 of this Act, AS

45.29.507(c)

, as amended by sec. 20 of this Act, AS

45.29.515(f)

, as amended by sec. 21 of this Act, AS

45.29.516(b)

, as amended by sec. 22 of this Act, AS

45.29.518

, as amended by sec. 23 of this Act, and AS

45.29.518(d)

and (e), added by sec. 24 of this Act, for an initial financing statement. If a financing statement indicates that the debtor is a decedent’s estate, the financing statement indicates that the collateral is being administered by a personal representative within the meaning of AS

45.29.503(a)(2)

, as repealed and reenacted by sec. 17 of this Act. If a financing statement indicates that the debtor is a trust or is a trustee acting with respect to property held in trust, the financing statement indicates that the collateral is held in a trust within the meaning of AS

45.29.503(a)(3)

, as repealed and reenacted by sec. 17 of this Act.”

Cross references. —

See also AS

45.29.705

.

Sec. 45.29.806.
When initial financing statement suffices to continue effectiveness of financing statement.

The filing of an initial financing statement in the office specified in AS

45.29.501

continues the effectiveness of a financing statement filed before July 1, 2013, if

the filing of an initial financing statement in that office would be effective to perfect a security interest under AS

45.29.101

—

45.29.709

, as those sections read on July 1, 2013;

the financing statement filed before July 1, 2013, was filed in an office in another state; and

the initial financing statement satisfies (c) of this section.

The filing of an initial financing statement under (a) of this section continues the effectiveness of the financing statement filed before July 1, 2013,

if the initial financing statement is filed before July 1, 2013, for the period provided in AS

45.29.515

, as that section existed before July 1, 2013, with respect to an initial financing statement; and

if the initial financing statement is filed on or after July 1, 2013, for the period provided in AS

45.29.515

, as that section existed before July 1, 2013, with respect to an initial financing statement.

To be effective for purposes of (a) of this section, an initial financing statement must

satisfy the requirements of AS

45.29.503(a)

, (b), and (f) — (h),

45.29.507(c)

,

45.29.515(f)

,

45.29.516(b)

, and

45.29.518

, as those provisions read on July 1, 2013, for an initial financing statement;

identify the financing statement filed before July 1, 2013, by indicating the office in which the financing statement was filed and providing the dates of filing and file numbers, if any, of the financing statement and of the most recent continuation statement filed with respect to the financing statement; and

indicate that the financing statement filed before July 1, 2013, remains effective.

History.

(§ 30 ch 64 SLA 2013)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as sec. 30, ch. 64, SLA 2013, and codified in 2013. Section 30, ch. 64, SLA 2013 reads: “Transition: When initial financing statement suffices to continue effectiveness of financing statement. (a) The filing of an initial financing statement in the office specified in AS

45.29.501

continues the effectiveness of a financing statement filed before July 1, 2013, if

“(1) the filing of an initial financing statement in that office would be effective to perfect a security interest under AS 45.29, as amended by secs. 3 — 25 of this Act;

“(2) the financing statement filed before July 1, 2013, was filed in an office in another state; and

“(3) the initial financing statement satisfies (c) of this section.

“(b) The filing of an initial financing statement under (a) of this section continues the effectiveness of the financing statement filed before July 1, 2013,

“(1) if the initial financing statement is filed before July 1, 2013, for the period provided in AS

45.29.515

, as that section existed before July 1, 2013, with respect to an initial financing statement; and

“(2) if the initial financing statement is filed on or after July 1, 2013, for the period provided in AS

45.29.515

, as that section existed before July 1, 2013, with respect to an initial financing statement.

“(c) To be effective for purposes of (a) of this section, an initial financing statement must

“(1) satisfy the requirements of AS

45.29.503(a)

, as repealed and reenacted by sec. 17 of this Act, AS

45.29.503(b)

, as amended by sec. 18 of this Act, AS

45.29.503(f)

— (h), added by sec. 19 of this Act, AS

45.29.507(c)

, as amended by sec. 20 of this Act, AS

45.29.515(f)

, as amended by sec. 21 of this Act, AS

45.29.516(b)

, as amended by sec. 22 of this Act, AS

45.29.518

, as amended by sec. 23 of this Act, and AS

45.29.518(d)

and (e), added by sec. 24 of this Act, for an initial financing statement;

“(2) identify the financing statement filed before July 1, 2013, by indicating the office in which the financing statement was filed and providing the dates of filing and file numbers, if any, of the financing statement and of the most recent continuation statement filed with respect to the financing statement; and

“(3) indicate that the financing statement filed before July 1, 2013, remains effective.”

Cross references. —

See also AS

45.29.706

.

Sec. 45.29.807.
Amendment of pre-effective-date financing statement.

After July 1, 2013, a person may add or delete collateral covered by, continue or terminate the effectiveness of, or otherwise amend the information provided in a pre-effective-date financing statement only in accordance with the law of the jurisdiction governing perfection as provided in AS

45.29.101

—

45.29.709

, as those sections read on July 1, 2013. However, the effectiveness of a pre-effective-date financing statement may also be terminated in accordance with the law of the jurisdiction in which the financing statement is filed.

Except as otherwise provided in (d) of this section, if the law of this state governs perfection of a security interest, the information in a pre-effective-date financing statement may be amended after July 1, 2013, only if

the pre-effective-date financing statement and an amendment are filed in the office specified in AS

45.29.501

;

an amendment is filed in the office specified in AS

45.29.501

concurrently with, or after the filing in that office of, an initial financing statement that satisfies AS

45.29.806(c)

; or

an initial financing statement that provides the information as amended and satisfies AS

45.29.806(c)

is filed in the office specified in AS 45.29.501.

If the law of this state governs perfection of a security interest, the effectiveness of a pre-effective-date financing statement may be continued only under AS

45.29.805(c)

and (e) or

45.29.806

.

Whether or not the law of this state governs perfection of a security interest, the effectiveness of a pre-effective-date financing statement filed in this state may be terminated on or after July 1, 2013, by filing a termination statement in the office in which the pre-effective-date financing statement is filed, unless an initial financing statement that satisfies AS

45.29.806(c)

has been filed in the office specified by the law of the jurisdiction governing perfection as provided in AS

45.29.101

—

45.29.709

, as those sections read on July 1, 2013, as the office in which to file a financing statement.

In this section, “pre-effective-date financing statement” means a financing statement filed before July 1, 2013.

History.

(§ 31 ch 64 SLA 2013)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as sec. 31, ch. 64, SLA 2013, and codified in 2013. Section 31, ch. 64, SLA 2013 reads:
“Transition: Amendment of pre-effective-date financing statement. (a) After July 1, 2013, a person may add or delete collateral covered by, continue or terminate the effectiveness of, or otherwise amend the information provided in a pre-effective-date financing statement only in accordance with the law of the jurisdiction governing perfection as provided in AS 45.29, as amended by secs. 3 — 25 of this Act. However, the effectiveness of a pre-effective-date financing statement may also be terminated in accordance with the law of the jurisdiction in which the financing statement is filed.

“(b) Except as otherwise provided in (d) of this section, if the law of this state governs perfection of a security interest, the information in a pre-effective-date financing statement may be amended after July 1, 2013, only if

“(1) the pre-effective-date financing statement and an amendment are filed in the office specified in AS

45.29.501

;

“(2) an amendment is filed in the office specified in AS

45.29.501

concurrently with, or after the filing in that office of, an initial financing statement that satisfies sec. 30(c) of this Act; or

“(3) an initial financing statement that provides the information as amended and satisfies sec. 30(c) of this Act is filed in the office specified in AS

45.29.501

.

“(c) If the law of this state governs perfection of a security interest, the effectiveness of a pre-effective-date financing statement may be continued only under secs. 29(c) and (e) or 30 of this Act.

“(d) Whether or not the law of this state governs perfection of a security interest, the effectiveness of a pre-effective-date financing statement filed in this state may be terminated on or after July 1, 2013, by filing a termination statement in the office in which the pre-effective-date financing statement is filed, unless an initial financing statement that satisfies sec. 30(c) of this Act has been filed in the office specified by the law of the jurisdiction governing perfection as provided in AS 45.29, as amended by secs. 3 — 25 of this Act, as the office in which to file a financing statement.

“(e) In this section, ‘pre-effective-date financing statement’ means a financing statement filed before July 1, 2013.”

Cross references. —

See also AS

45.29.707

.

Sec. 45.29.808.
Person entitled to file initial financing statement or continuation statement.

A person may file an initial financing statement or a continuation statement under AS

45.29.802

—

45.29.809

if

the secured party of record authorizes the filing; and

the filing is necessary under AS

45.29.802

—

45.29.809

to continue the effectiveness of a financing statement filed before July 1, 2013; or

to perfect or continue the perfection of a security interest.

History.

(§ 32 ch 64 SLA 2013)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as sec. 32, ch. 64, SLA 2013, and codified in 2013. Section 32, ch. 64, SLA 2013 reads:
“Transition: Person entitled to file initial financing statement or continuation statement. A person may file an initial financing statement or a continuation statement under secs. 26 — 33 of this Act if

“(1) the secured party of record authorizes the filing; and

“(2) the filing is necessary under secs. 26 — 33 of this Act

“(A) to continue the effectiveness of a financing statement filed before July 1, 2013; or

“(B) to perfect or continue the perfection of a security interest.”

Cross references. —

See also AS

45.29.708

.

Sec. 45.29.809.
Priority.

AS

45.29.102(a)(8)

, (13), (61), (85), and (88),

45.29.105

,

45.29.307(f)

,

45.29.311(a)

,

45.29.316(h)

and (i),

45.29.317(b)

and (d),

45.29.326

,

45.29.406(e)

,

45.29.408(b)

,

45.29.503(a)

, (b), and (f) — (h),

45.29.507(c)

,

45.29.515(f)

,

45.29.516(b)

,

45.29.518

,

45.29.607(b)

, as those provisions read on July 1, 2013, and AS

45.29.802

—

45.29.808

, determine the priority of conflicting claims to collateral.
However, if the relative priorities of the claims were established before July 1, 2013, this chapter as it existed before July 1, 2013, determines priority.

History.

(§ 33 ch 64 SLA 2013)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as sec. 33, ch. 64, SLA 2013, and codified in 2013. Section 33, ch. 64, SLA 2013 reads: “Transition: Priority. Sections 3 — 32 of this Act determine the priority of conflicting claims to collateral. However, if the relative priorities of the claims were established before July 1, 2013, AS 45.29, as it existed before being amended by secs. 3 — 25 of this Act, determines priority.”

Cross references. —

See also AS

45.29.709

.

Sec. 45.29.810.
Instructions to department of natural resources.

The Department of Natural Resources shall adopt, amend, or repeal regulations to implement AS

45.29.102(a)(8)

, (13), (61), (85), and (88),

45.29.105

,

45.29.307(f)

,

45.29.311(a)

,

45.29.316(h)

and (i),

45.29.317(b)

and (d),

45.29.326

,

45.29.406(e)

,

45.29.408(b)

,

45.29.503(a)

, (b), and (f) - (h),

45.29.507(c)

,

45.29.515(f)

,

45.29.516(b)

,

45.29.518

, and

45.29.607(b)

, as those sections read on July 1, 2013, and this section. The regulations take effect under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act), but not before July 1, 2013.

On and after July 1, 2013, the following forms that the Department of Natural Resources provides for filing under AS

45.29.101

—

45.29.709

, as those provisions read on July 1, 2013, must be identical to the forms that were adopted by the American Law Institute and the National Conference of Commissioners on Uniform State Laws and with AS

45.29.102(a)(8)

, (13), (61), (85), and (88),

45.29.105

,

45.29.307(f)

,

45.29.311(a)

,

45.29.316(h)

and (i),

45.29.317(b)

and (d),

45.29.326

,

45.29.406(e)

,

45.29.408(b)

,

45.29.503(a)

, (b), and (f) — (h),

45.29.507(c)

,

45.29.515(f)

,

45.29.516(b)

,

45.29.518

, and

45.29.607(b)

, as those provisions read on July 1, 2013:

UCC Financing Statement;

UCC Financing Statement Addendum;

UCC Financing Statement Amendment; and

UCC Financing Statement Amendment Addendum.

History.

(§ 34 ch 64 SLA 2013)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as sec. 34, ch. 64, SLA 2013, and codified in 2013. Section 34, ch. 64, SLA 2013 reads: “Instructions to department of natural resources. (a) The Department of Natural Resources shall adopt, amend, or repeal regulations to implement the changes made by secs. 3 — 25 of this Act and this section. The regulations take effect under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act), but not before July 1, 2013.

“(b) On and after July 1, 2013, the following forms that the Department of Natural Resources provides for filing under AS 45.29, as amended by secs. 3 — 25 of this Act, must be identical to the forms that were adopted by the American Law Institute and the National Conference of Commissioners on Uniform State Laws and with the amendments made by secs. 3 — 25 of this Act:

“(1) UCC Financing Statement;

“(2) UCC Financing Statement Addendum;

“(3) UCC Financing Statement Amendment; and

“(4) UCC Financing Statement Amendment Addendum.”

Sec. 45.29.811.
Saving clause.

AS

45.29.102(a)(8)

, (13), (61), (85), and (88),

45.29.105

,

45.29.307(f)

,

45.29.311(a)

,

45.29.316(h)

and (i),

45.29.317(b)

and (d),

45.29.326

,

45.29.406(e)

,

45.29.408(b)

,

45.29.503(a)

, (b), and (f) — (h),

45.29.507(c)

,

45.29.515(f)

,

45.29.516(b)

,

45.29.518

, and

45.29.607(b)

, as those provisions read on July 1, 2013, and AS

45.29.802

—

45.29.810

do not affect an action, case, or proceeding commenced before July 1, 2013.

History.

(§ 35 ch 64 SLA 2013)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as sec. 35, ch. 64, SLA 2013, and codified in 2013. Section 35, ch. 64, SLA 2013 reads:
“Saving clause. Sections 3 — 34 of this Act do not affect an action, case, or proceeding commenced before July 1, 2013.”

Cross references. —

See also AS

45.29.702

.